Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.121

Precinct.

"Precinct" means a geographical subdivision for voting purposes that is established by a county legislative authority.

[ 2003 c 111 s 121; 1965 c 9 s 29.01.120. Prior: 1933 c 1 s 2; RRS s 5114-2; prior: 1915 c 16 s 1; RRS s 5114. Formerly RCW 29.01.120.]